Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1515
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund; use; legislative intent.

(1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that a statewide system for the collection, storage, and transfer of data on vehicle titles and registration and the cooperation of state and local government in implementing such a system is essential to the efficient operation of state and local government in vehicle titling and registration. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the electronic issuance of operators' licenses and state identification cards using a digital system as described in section 60-484.01 and the cooperation of state and local government in implementing such a system is essential to the efficient operation of state and local government in issuing operators' licenses and state identification cards.

(2) It is therefor the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Motor Vehicles shall use a portion of the fees appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund as follows:

(a) To pay for the cost of issuing motor vehicle titles and registrations on a system designated by the department. The costs shall include, but not be limited to, software and software maintenance, programming, processing charges, and equipment including such terminals, printers, or other devices as deemed necessary by the department after consultation with the county to support the issuance of motor vehicle titles and registrations. The costs shall not include the cost of county personnel or physical facilities provided by the counties;

(b) To fund the centralization of renewal notices for motor vehicle registration and to furnish to the counties the certificate of registration forms specified in section 60-390. The certificate of registration form shall be prescribed by the department;

(c) To pay for the costs of an operator's license system as specified in sections 60-484.01 and 60-4,119 and designated by the department. The costs shall be limited to such terminals, printers, software, programming, and other equipment or devices as deemed necessary by the department to support the issuance of such licenses and state identification cards in the counties and by the department; and

(d) To pay for the motor vehicle insurance database created under section 60-3,136.

(3) The department shall utilize three dollars of each fee allocated to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund from state identification cards valid for five years and Class O or M operators' licenses valid for five years to open and operate an additional operators' licensing service center.

Laws 1993, LB 491, § 19;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 31;

Laws 2002, LB 488, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 258;

Laws 2013, LB207, § 6;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 72.